Illinois, session 104th, HB4011.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-145 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/9-145)7    Sec. 9-145. Statutory level of assessment.      8    (a) Except in counties with more than 200,000 inhabitants 9which classify property for purposes of taxation, property 10shall be valued as follows: 11        (1) (a) Each tract or lot of property shall be valued 12    at 33 1/3% of its fair cash value. 13        (2) (b) Each taxable leasehold estate shall be valued 14    at 33 1/3% of its fair cash value. 15        (3) (c) Each building or structure which is located on 16    the right of way of any canal, railroad or other company 17    leased or granted to another company or person for a term 18    of years, shall be valued at 33 1/3% of its fair cash 19    value. 20        (4) (d) Any property on which there is a coal or other 21    mine, or stone or other quarry, shall be valued at 33 1/3% 22    of its fair cash value. Oil, gas and other minerals, 23    except coal, shall have value and be assessed separately   HB4011- 2 -LRB104 12379 HLH 22617 b1    at 33 1/3% of the fair cash value of such oil, gas and 2    other minerals. Coal shall be assessed separately at 33 3    1/3% of the coal reserve economic value, as provided in 4    Sections 10-170 through 10-200. 5        (5) (e) In the assessment of property encumbered by 6    public easement, any depreciation occasioned by such 7    easement shall be deducted in the valuation of such 8    property. Any property dedicated as a nature preserve or 9    as a nature preserve buffer under the Illinois Natural 10    Areas Preservation Act, for the purposes of this 11    paragraph, is encumbered by a public easement and shall be 12    depreciated for assessment purposes to a level at which 13    its valuation shall be $1 per acre or portion thereof.14    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning 15with the 2026 assessment year, in all counties, the equalized 16assessed value of property in a general assessment year shall 17not exceed the equalized assessed value of the property in the 18immediately preceding general assessment year, increased by 19the lesser of: 20        (1) 3% of the equalized assessed value of the property 21    for the immediately preceding general assessment year; or 22        (2) the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer 23    Price Index during the 12-month calendar year preceding 24    the general assessment year for which the property is 25    being reassessed. 26    The limitation under this subsection (b) does not apply if   HB4011- 3 -LRB104 12379 HLH 22617 b1the increase in assessment is attributable to an addition, 2improvement, or modification to the property. 3    As used in this Section, "Consumer Price Index" means the 4index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 5United States Department of Labor that measures the average 6change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 7consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 8100. 9    This subsection (b) is a denial and limitation under 10subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 11Constitution on the power of home rule units to tax. 12    (c) This Section is subject to and modified by Sections 1310-110 through 10-140 and 11-5 through 11-65.14(Source: P.A. 91-497, eff. 1-1-00.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.